District of Columbia statutes.
42-3502.17

Security deposit.

(a)

No person shall demand or receive a security deposit from any tenant for a rental unit occupied by the tenant upon July 17, 1985, where no security deposit had been demanded or received of the tenant for the rental unit before July 17, 1985, but this provision shall not prevent the collection of security deposits for newly constructed units or units exempted under § 42-3502.05(a)(4) and (7). Security deposits shall be collected pursuant to the Security Deposit Act, effective February 20, 1976 (D.C. Law 1-48; 14 DCMR 308 et seq.).

(b)

The Office of Administrative Hearings may adjudicate complaints for the non-return of tenant security deposits and for the nonpayment of interest on tenant security deposits pursuant to section 2908 of the Housing Regulations of the District of Columbia (14 DCMR §§ 308 through 311).

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 217, 32 DCR 3089
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-276, § 3, 54 DCR 889
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-366, § 2(h), 56 DCR 1332
June 7, 2012, D.C. Law 19-140, § 2, 59 DCR 2879

History

This section is referenced in § 42-3502.05.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 45-2527.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 16-276 designated existing text as subsec. (a) and inserted subsec. (b).
D.C. Law 17-366, in subsec. (b), inserted “and for the nonpayment of interest on tenant security deposits” following “tenant security deposits”.
D.C. Law 19-140, in subsec. (b), substituted “complaints for the non-return of” for “complaints for the nonpayment of interest on”.

Effect of Amendments

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3502.01.

Expiration of Law

For Law 17-366, see notes following § 42-3401.03.

Editor's Notes